Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Kentucky Blue Alert System

16.177.
Operation and administration of Kentucky Blue Alert System — Administrative regulations.

The Department of Kentucky State Police in cooperation with the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, Transportation Cabinet, the Division of Emergency Management of the Department of Military Affairs, broadcasters, and the news media shall operate a system to notify the public when a peace officer has been killed, injured, or is missing in the line of duty and the department determines that public notification might aid in the apprehension of a suspect or the recovery of the officer. The system shall be known as the Kentucky Blue Alert System.

The Kentucky Blue Alert System shall utilize existing resources, including but not limited to electronic highway signs; the Amber Alert System; law enforcement communications systems; electronic media; local, regional, and statewide media providers; and the Emergency Alert System, if authorized and under conditions permitted by the federal government.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall promulgate administrative regulations for the operation and administration of the Kentucky Blue Alert System.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 124, § 1, effective July 12, 2012.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2012). 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 124, sec. 3, provides that the Act, which created this statute and KRS

16.179

, shall be known as the “Trooper Jonathan K. Leonard Kentucky Blue Alert System Act.”

16.179.
When public alert may be issued — Duties of requesting agency,
department, and all law enforcement agencies in Kentucky.

No public alert using the Kentucky Blue Alert System shall be issued unless requested by a law enforcement agency and, upon consultation with that agency, the department determines:

That a peace officer has been killed, seriously injured, or is missing in the line of duty;

That public notification is the most appropriate method of locating the officer or identifying and locating a suspected offender who poses an imminent threat to the public or other law enforcement personnel;

That there is sufficient information available relating to the officer’s last known location and the physical description of any suspected offender or vehicle involved that could be broadcast to assist in locating the officer or suspected offender; and

The geographic area in which the notification shall be made.

The requesting agency shall provide the information required by administrative regulation to the Department of Kentucky State Police prior to activation of the Kentucky Blue Alert System.

If it is determined by the department that public notification shall be initiated, the department shall notify the public and private agencies and organizations that will provide the notification and provide those agencies and organizations with the information that the department deems necessary.

All law enforcement agencies in the Commonwealth shall cooperate with the department in the provision and dissemination of information regarding any peace officer who has been killed, seriously injured, or is missing in the line of duty.

No law enforcement agency, other than the department, shall activate the Kentucky Blue Alert System without the authority of the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 124, § 2, effective July 12, 2012.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2012). 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 124, sec. 3, provides that the Act, which created this statute and KRS

16.179

, shall be known as the “Trooper Jonathan K. Leonard Kentucky Blue Alert System Act.”

16.180.
Transfer of facilities and personnel of Highway Patrol; Continuation of pending proceedings; State Police to replace Highway Patrol. [Repealed.]

16.185.
Indemnification of State Police officer sued for act or omission in line of duty who suffers financial loss — Construction of indemnification.

Any officer or individual employed as a Trooper R Class who is sued for any act or omission in the line of duty and who has a judgment for monetary damages rendered against him or her in his or her individual capacity, and who personally suffers actual financial loss, unreimbursed from any source, by the enforcement and satisfaction of the judgment, including any costs or attorney fees awarded pursuant thereto, shall be indemnified by the Commonwealth, from funds appropriated to the Finance and Administration Cabinet for the payment of judgments, to the extent of his or her actual financial loss.

The indemnification shall be contingent upon an express determination by the commissioner that the act or omission which resulted in liability was within the scope and course of the officer’s or the individual employed as a Trooper R Class’s employment and occurred during the performance of duty and was committed or omitted in the good faith belief that the act or omission was lawful and proper.

If the officer seeking indemnification is the commissioner, the determination referred to in subsection (2) of this section shall be made by the Governor.

The indemnification shall not be construed to abrogate or limit any privilege, immunity, or matter of defense otherwise available to the officer or individual employed as a Trooper R Class and shall not constitute a waiver of any privilege, immunity, or matter of defense, including the sovereign immunity of the Commonwealth.

The indemnification shall not be the subject of comment, directly or indirectly, before any jury hearing any cause of action in which an officer or individual employed as a Trooper R Class is a party, and any comment before the jury shall result in an immediate mistrial.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 161, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2007, ch. 85, § 68, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 59, § 10, effective June 25, 2009.